Missouri, session 2026, SB1110.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 138.190 and 138.200, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 138.190 and 138.200, to read as follows:
138.190. There is hereby created within the state
department of revenue a commission to be known and
designated as the "State Tax Commission". The director of
revenue shall have no supervision, authority or control over
such actions or decisions of the state tax commission as
relates to its duties prescribed by law. The state tax
commission shall be composed of [three] five members, chosen
from the two major political parties, who shall be appointed
by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate,
one of whom shall be designated chairman, and to hold office
for staggered terms of six years[; provided, however, that
of members first appointed, one member shall be appointed
for a term of two years, one member for a term of four
years, and one member for a term of six years]. Each
commissioner shall hold office until his successor shall
qualify.
138.200. 1. Each commissioner shall be a qualified
voter and taxpayer and resident of the state for at least
five years next preceding his appointment. At all times the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1110 2
state tax commission shall be so constituted that not more
than [two] three members shall be of the same political
party.
2. In the event of a vacancy occurring while the
general assembly is not in session, the governor may appoint
a temporary member of the commission to serve until such
time as a permanent appointment can be made with the advice
and consent of the senate.
3. Each commissioner shall devote his full time and
efforts to the discharge of his duties and shall not accept
any private employment of any kind or nature while serving
on the commission nor hold any other office under the laws
of this state, or any city, or county, or city and county,
in this state, nor any office under the government of the
United States.
4. No commissioner or employee of the commission shall
hold any position of profit, engage in any occupation or
business interfering with, or inconsistent with, his duties
as commissioner or employee. No person is eligible to
appointment or shall hold the office of commissioner, or be
appointed by the commission, or hold any office or position
under the commission, who holds any official office or
position or who is a stockholder or who is in any wise
pecuniarily interested in any common carrier, public
utility, or any other corporation whose original assessment
is made by the commission, as provided by this chapter. The
words "original assessment" as used herein shall not be held
or construed to include the assessment of corporation
franchise tax.
✓